California statutes. Insurance Code
(b) The assets of a title insurer other than the unearned premium reserve shall be available to pay claims for losses sustained by holders of policies then pending or arising up to the time reinsurance is effected. In the event that claims for losses are in excess of such other assets of a title insurer, the excess of such claims, when established, shall be paid pro rata out of surplus assets attributable to the unearned premium reserve to the extent of such surplus, if any.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 272.)
-------------------------------------------

12386.

In the event that reinsurance is not obtained, as authorized by Section 12385, the unearned premium reserve and assets constituting the guarantee fund of the title insurer, or so much as remains thereof after outstanding claims have been paid, shall constitute a trust fund to be held by the commissioner for twenty (20) years, out of which claims of policyholders shall be paid as they arise. The balance, if any, of such fund shall, at the expiration of twenty (20) years, constitute general assets of the title insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 272.)
-------------------------------------------

12387.

Where a title insurer organized or incorporated under the laws of any state other than California does business in California, if the laws of the state of its domicile obligate such company to create and maintain an unearned premium reserve for purposes substantially similar to those of this article, any amounts required by the law of such state to be added to such reserve by reason of business done in California shall be deducted from any amounts required by this article to be set aside by such title insurer in an unearned premium reserve for its California business.

The provisions of this section shall be applicable only to title
 insurers organized or incorporated in those states whose laws provide that a title insurer organized and incorporated under the laws of California and which does business in such other state will be permitted a deduction substantially similar to that provided by this section with respect to any unearned premium reserve requirements for business done in that state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 272.)
-------------------------------------------

12388.

Every title insurer shall, in addition to other reserves establish and maintain a reserve to be known as the “reserve for unpaid losses and loss adjustment expense”, which shall be used for the payment of losses incurred as a result of liability arising under policies of title insurance and the payment of adjustment expenses necessary for the settlement of or defense against claims of any such liability. Said reserve shall be in an amount equal to the sum of (1) the estimated amounts necessary to pay unpaid losses, plus (2) the estimated amounts of loss adjustment expense necessary to settle or defend against every claim presented pursuant to notice from or on behalf of every
 insured that may result in a loss to or cause expense to be incurred by a title insurer for the proper disposition of the claim. Every title insurer shall calculate such reserve by making a careful estimate in each year of the amounts anticipated to be reasonably necessary for both such purposes. The sum of the items so estimated shall be the total amount of the reserve for unpaid losses and loss adjustment expenses of such title insurer. The amounts so estimated may be revised from time to time as circumstances warrant and reduced by the amount of payments made, but shall be redetermined at least once each year. The amounts set aside in such reserve in any year shall be deducted in determining the net profits for such period of any title insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 272.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.7. Underwritten Title Companies [12389. - 12389.7.]

12389.

(a) On and after July 1, 2016, an underwritten title company as defined in Section 12340.5 that is a stock corporation may, subject to subdivision (b), (1) engage in the business of preparing title searches, title reports, title examinations, or certificates or abstracts of title, upon the basis of which a title insurer writes title policies, and (2) conduct escrow services through business locations, as defined in Section 12340.13, in counties in which the underwritten title company is licensed to conduct escrow services regardless of the location of the real or personal property involved in the transaction.

(b) (1) Only a domestic corporation may be licensed under this section and no underwritten title company, as defined in Section 12340.5,
 may become licensed under this section, or change the name under which it is licensed or operates, unless it has first complied with Section 881.

(2) (A) Depending upon the county or counties in which the company is licensed to transact business, it shall maintain required minimum net worth and a bond or cash deposit as follows:Aggregate number of documents
recorded and documents filed in the
preceding calendar year in all counties
where the company is licensed to transact
businessNumber of documentsAmount of required 
minimum net worthAmount of bond or
 cash depositLess than 50,000$ 75,000$ 50,00050,000 to 100,000120,00050,000100,000 to 500,000200,000100,000500,000 to 1,000,000300,000100,0001,000,000 or more400,000100,000(B) “Net worth” for the purposes of this section is defined as the excess of assets over all liabilities and required reserves. The company may carry as an asset the actual cost of its title plant, provided the value ascribed to that asset shall not exceed the aggregate value of all other assets.

(C) If a title plant of an underwritten title company is not currently maintained, the asset value of the plant shall not exceed its asset value as determined in the preceding paragraph as of the date to which that plant is currently maintained, less one-tenth thereof for each succeeding year or part of the succeeding year that the plant is not being currently maintained. For the purposes of this section, a title plant shall be deemed currently maintained so long as it is used in the normal conduct of the business of title insurance, and (i) the owner of the plant continues regularly to obtain and index title record data to the plant or to
 a continuation thereof in a format other than that previously used, including, but not limited to, computerization of the data, or (ii) the owner of the plant is a participant, in an arrangement for joint use of a title plant system regularly maintained in any format, provided the owner is contractually entitled to receive a copy of the title record data contained in the jointly used title plant system during the period of the owner’s participation therein, either periodically or upon termination of that participation, at a cost not to exceed the actual cost of duplication of the title record data.

(D) An underwritten title company shall at all times maintain current assets of at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in excess of its current liabilities, as current assets and liabilities may be defined pursuant to regulations made by the commissioner. In making the regulations, the commissioner shall be guided by generally accepted accounting
 principles followed by certified public accountants in this state.

(3) (A) An underwritten title company shall obtain from the commissioner a license to transact its business. The license shall not be granted until the applicant conforms to the requirements of this section and all other provisions of this code specifically applicable to the applicant. After issuance the holder of the license shall continue to comply with the requirements as to its business set forth in this code, in the applicable rules and regulations of the commissioner, and in the laws of this state.

(B) An underwritten title company that possesses, or is required to possess, a license pursuant to this section shall be subject as if an insurer to the provisions of Article 8 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1, and is deemed to be subject to authorization by
 the Insurance Commissioner within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 25100 of the Corporations Code.

(C) The license may be obtained by filing an application on a form prescribed by the commissioner accompanied by a filing fee of eight hundred forty-nine dollars ($849). The license when issued shall be for an indefinite term and shall expire with the termination of the existence of the holder, subject to the annual renewal fee imposed under Sections 12415 and 12416.

(D) An underwritten title company seeking to extend its license to an additional county shall pay a four-hundred-ninety-four-dollar ($494) fee for each additional county, and shall furnish to the commissioner evidence, at least sufficient to meet the minimum net worth requirements of paragraph (2), of its financial ability to expand its business operation to include the additional county or counties.

(4) (A) An underwritten title company shall furnish an audit to the commissioner on the forms provided by the commissioner annually, either on a calendar year basis on or before March 31 or, if approved in writing by the commissioner in respect to any individual company, on a fiscal year basis on or before 90 days after the end of the fiscal year. The time for furnishing any audit required by this paragraph may be extended, for good cause shown, on written approval of the commissioner for a period, not to exceed 60 days. Failure to submit an audit on time, or within the extended time that the commissioner may grant, is grounds for an order by the commissioner to accept no new business pursuant to subdivision (g). The audits shall be private, except that a synopsis of the balance sheet on a form prescribed by the commissioner may be made available to the public.

(B) The audits shall be made in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards by an independent certified public accountant or independent licensed public accountant whose certification or license is in good standing at the time of the preparation. The fee for filing the audit shall be seven hundred fifty dollars ($750).

(C) The commissioner may refuse to accept an audit or order a new audit for any of the following reasons:

(i) An adverse result in any proceeding before the California Board of Accountancy affecting the auditor’s license.

(ii) The auditor has an affiliation with the underwritten title company or any of its officers or directors that would prevent his or her reports on the company from being reasonably objective.

(iii) The auditor has been convicted of a misdemeanor or felony based on his or her activities as an accountant.

(iv) A judgment adverse to the auditor in any civil action finding him or her guilty of fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation in the practice of his or her profession.

(D) A company that fails to file an audit or other report on or before the date it is due shall pay to the commissioner a penalty fee of two hundred eighty-three dollars ($283) and on failure to pay that or another fee or file the audit required by this section shall forfeit the privilege of accepting new business until the delinquency is corrected.

(c) An underwritten title company may engage in the escrow business and act as escrow agent, provided that:

(1) It
 maintains a record of all receipts and disbursements of escrow funds.

(2) (A) It maintains a bond satisfactory to the commissioner in the amount set forth in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). The bond shall run to the state for the use of the state, and for any person who has cause against the obligor of the bond or under the provisions of this chapter.

(B) (i) In lieu of the bond described in subparagraph (A), the company may maintain a deposit in the amount set forth in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), and in a form permitted by Section 12351, with the commissioner, who shall immediately make a special deposit in that amount in the State Treasury. The deposit shall be subject to Sections 12353, 12356, 12357, and 12358. As long as there are no claims against the deposit, all interest and
 dividends thereon shall be paid to the depositor. The deposit shall be security for the same beneficiaries and purposes as the bond, as set forth in subdivision (d). The deposit shall be maintained until four years after all escrows handled by the depositor have been closed.

(ii) The commissioner may release the deposit prior to the passage of the four-year period described in clause (i) upon presentation of evidence satisfactory to the commissioner of either a statutory merger of the depositor into a licensee subject to the jurisdiction of the commissioner, or a valid assumption agreement under which the liability of the depositor stemming from escrow transactions handled by it is assumed by a licensee subject to the jurisdiction of the commissioner.

(iii) With the foregoing exceptions, the deposit shall be returned to the depositor or lawful successor in interest following the
 four-year period described in clause (i) upon presentation of evidence satisfactory to the commissioner that there are no claims against the deposit arising out of escrow transactions handled by the depositor. If claims against the deposit are presented to the commissioner, the commissioner may pay a valid claim or claims until the deposit amount is exhausted. If the commissioner has evidence of one or more claims against the depositor, and the depositor is in conservatorship, bankruptcy, or liquidation proceedings, the commissioner may release the deposit to the conservator, trustee, or liquidator. If the depositor is not in conservatorship, bankruptcy, or liquidation, the commissioner may interplead the deposit by special endorsement to a court of competent jurisdiction for distribution to claimants on the deposit.

(d) (1) The bond provided by a surety insurer pursuant to subdivision (c) naming the underwritten title
 company as principal obligor or the letter of credit of an issuing bank shall be subject to the following conditions:

(A) The licensee shall faithfully conform to and abide by the provisions of this chapter and all of the rules made by the commissioner under this chapter concerning the conduct of escrow services.

(B) The licensee will honestly and faithfully apply all funds received, and will faithfully and honestly perform all obligations and undertakings under this chapter, concerning the conduct of escrow services.

(2) In determining the liability of the principal and the sureties under the bond, any money recovered to restore any deficiency in the trust shall not be considered as an asset of the liquidation subject to the assessment for the cost of the liquidation.

(3) The surety under the bond, or the issuing bank of a letter of credit, may pay the full amount of its liability thereunder to the commissioner as conservator, liquidator, receiver, or anyone appointed by the commissioner as a conservator, liquidator, or receiver in lieu of payment to the state or persons having a cause of action against the principal of a bond or applicant under a letter of credit, and upon that payment the surety on the bond, or the issuing bank under a letter of credit shall be completely released, discharged, and exonerated from further liability under the bond or letter of credit, as applicable. The conservator, liquidator, or receiver may use the proceeds of the bond, or letter of credit, for any purposes, including the funding of the costs of conservatorship, receivership, or liquidation.

(4) If there is no reasonable or adequate admitted market for surety
 bonds as required by this section, the commissioner may act pursuant to Section 1763.1 or, for good cause shown, may permit a letter of credit in lieu thereof, and in the amount of the bond or deposit required by this section. In that case, the commissioner may fashion the letter of credit requirements as appropriate to the circumstances and cause.

(e) (1) On and after July 1, 2016, the commissioner shall promptly release to the depositor, upon application, all escrow-related deposits previously made pursuant to paragraph (2) as that paragraph read on June 30, 2016, if any of the following occurs:

(A) The underwritten title company has provided to the commissioner bond coverage, a deposit, or an approved irrevocable letter of credit as set forth in this subdivision.

(B) Upon presentation of
 evidence satisfactory to the commissioner of either a statutory merger of the underwritten title company depositor into a licensee or certificate holder subject to the jurisdiction of the commissioner, or a valid assumption agreement under which all liability of the depositor stemming from escrow transactions handled by it is assumed by a licensee or certificate holder subject to the jurisdiction of the commissioner.

(2) Otherwise, the deposit shall be promptly returned to the depositor, its duly appointed trustee in bankruptcy, or its lawful successor in interest upon application for release following the four-year period specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) as that paragraph read on June 30, 2016, unless the commissioner has received claims against the deposit stemming from escrow transactions handled by the depositor. If the commissioner has received one or more claims against the depositor, and the depositor is not in
 conservatorship, bankruptcy, or liquidation, the commissioner may interplead the deposit by special endorsement to a court of competent jurisdiction for distribution on the basis that claims against the depositor stemming from escrow transactions handled by the depositor have priority in the distribution over other claims against the depositor.

(f) The commissioner shall, whenever it appears necessary, examine the business and affairs of a company licensed under this section. The examination shall be at the expense of the company.

(g) (1) At any time that the commissioner determines, after notice and hearing, that a company licensed under this section has willfully failed to comply with a provision of this section, the commissioner shall make his or her order prohibiting the company from conducting its business for a period of not more than one year.

(2) A company that violates the commissioner’s order is subject to seizure under Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and may have its license revoked by the commissioner. Any person aiding and abetting any company in a violation of the commissioner’s order is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(h) The purpose of this section is to maintain the solvency of the companies subject to this section and to protect the public by preventing fraud and requiring fair dealing. In order to carry out these purposes, the commissioner may make reasonable rules and regulations to govern the conduct of its business of companies subject to this section. The rules and regulations shall be adopted, amended, or repealed in accordance with the procedures provided in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2
 of the Government Code.

(i) The name under which each underwritten title company is licensed shall at all times be an approved name. The fee for filing an application for a change of name shall be two hundred eighty-three dollars ($283). Each company shall be subject to Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010) and Article 14.5 (commencing with Section 1065.1) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(j) This section does not prohibit an underwritten title company from engaging in escrow, settlement, or closing activities on properties located outside this state if those activities do not violate the laws of that other state or country.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 79.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12389.1.

Before granting a license or a reissued license to act as an underwritten title company to any applicant, the commissioner shall consider the qualifications of the applicant in respect to the following subjects: (a) minimum net worth and working capital; (b) reasonableness of its plan of operation; (c) lawfulness and quality of investments; (d) financial stability; (e) competency, character, and integrity of management; (f) ownership and control of issued and outstanding shares; (g) fairness and honesty of methods of doing business; (h) method by which the applicant was promoted if any of its promoters remain as stockholders or in management; and (i)
 hazard to the public.

Upon consideration of all relevant qualifications, the commissioner shall issue or reissue a license to act as an underwritten title company to the applicant, unless the commissioner shall have made a finding, or findings, that the applicant is materially deficient in respect to one or more of the items outlined herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 417, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

12389.2.

After the issuance or reissuance of a license to act as an underwritten title company, the holder shall continue to comply with the requirements as to its business set forth in Section 12389.1 and in the other applicable sections of this code, and in the other laws of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 417, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12389.3.

When there exists a restriction in a stock certificate requiring the consent of the department prior to the transfer of the stock, the request for consent to transfer shall be submitted to the department for approval. Requests for consent to transfer stock certificates representing less than 10 percent of the outstanding stock of the company to existing stockholders, the company which issued the stock, or persons who have been employed by the underwritten title company for the preceding 12 months, shall be approved or denied by the department within 60 days of
 the request for consent to transfer. If no action is taken by the department within 60 days, the request for consent to transfer stock certificates shall be deemed approved. In no event may the 60-day period be extended or waived by the applicant or the department. The time limits set forth in this section shall not apply where the transfer of the stock would result in the transferee, other than the company which issued the stock, owning 10 percent or more of the outstanding stock of the company.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 991, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

12389.4.

An underwritten title company shall furnish a quarterly financial statement to the commissioner on forms prescribed by the commissioner on or before 30 days after each calendar quarter ending March 31, June 30, and September 30. Underwritten title companies that are specifically approved to report on a fiscal year basis shall file a quarterly financial statement 30 days after the end of each fiscal quarter. The commissioner is authorized to require an underwritten title company to provide supplemental accounting and financial information when the commissioner
 deems it to be necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 991, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

12389.5.

Every person engaged in the business of preparing title searches, title examinations, title reports, and certificates of abstracts of title, upon which a title insurer writes title policies, is required to be licensed as an underwritten title company in compliance with the licensing requirements of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 433, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

12389.6.

(a) Prior to the disbursement by an underwritten title company from any escrow account under Section 12413.1, each underwriting agreement between the underwritten title company and a title insurer shall contain one of the following written procedures reasonably calculated to prevent the misappropriation, disappearance, or wrongful use of funds deposited in the underwritten title company’s escrow or subescrow account:

(1) The underwritten title company shall obtain and maintain
 a fidelity bond or insurance policy, satisfactory to the title insurer agreeing to this option that covers losses caused by misappropriation, disappearance, or other wrongful use of escrow funds deposited with the underwritten title company. The face amount of the fidelity bond or insurance policy shall be at least 10 times the underwritten title company’s required minimum net worth under subdivision (a) of Section 12389. The bond or insurance policy shall name as an additional insured, co-insured, or joint-loss payee each of the title insurers agreeing to this option in the underwriting agreement. The bond or policy may not exclude coverage due to acts or omissions of any officer, director, employee, or principal of the underwritten title company. In the event of cancellation or nonrenewal of the bond or policy, a title insurance company named as an additional insured, co-insured, or joint-loss payee shall be given advance written notice by the underwriter of the bond or policy. The underwritten title
 company shall submit a copy of the bond or policy to the title insurer named as an additional insured, co-insured, or joint-loss payee within 14 days of the effective date of the underwriting agreement.

(2) Disbursements of escrow funds shall be reviewed and approved by an employee of the title insurer. Title insurer employees who review and approve disbursements of escrow funds shall be physically located at the place of business of the underwritten title company and shall be on the title insurer’s payroll. Before review and approval of any disbursement, the employee shall sign an affidavit to be filed with and on a form approved by the commissioner. The affiant shall attest that the affiant has read, is familiar with, and agrees to comply with the title insurer’s approval procedures for disbursements.

(3) Account review processes and oversight and internal control guidelines, in
 electronic or other medium, drafted by a title insurance industry advisory organization, as defined in Section 12340.8, and approved by the commissioner.

(4) Written procedures approved by the commissioner that provide for the protection and control of escrow funds in a manner consistent with the purposes of this subdivision.

(b) The commissioner shall approve or deny any written procedures submitted to him or her under this section for approval within 60 days of receiving the request. If no action is taken by the commissioner within the 60-day period, the request is deemed approved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 408, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

12389.7.

(a) Sections 1070, 1070.5, 1070.6, 1071.5, 1072, and 1076 shall be applicable to underwritten title companies.

(b) The following terms from Sections 1070, 1070.5, 1070.6, 1071.5, 1072, and 1076 shall be applicable to underwritten title companies as follows:

(1) “Certificate of Authority” shall mean an underwritten title company license.

(2) “Insurer” shall mean an underwritten title company.

(3) “Reinsurer” shall mean a title underwriter or another underwritten title company.

(c) For the purposes of this section, Sections 1070, 1070.5, 1070.6, 1071.5, 1072, and 1076 shall be construed in accordance with the nature of underwritten title companies and the business of title insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 321, Sec. 26.   (AB 1391)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. General Powers [12390. - 12394.]

12390.

Every domestic title insurer may issue title policies and may also insure:

(a) The identity, due execution, and validity of any note or bond secured by mortgage.

(b) The identity, due execution, validity and recording of any such mortgage. 

(c) The identity, due execution and validity of evidences of indebtedness issued by this State, or by any political subdivision or district therein, or by any private or public corporation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12391.

Such insurer also may:

(a) Act as registrar or transfer agent of this State, or of any political subdivision or district therein, or of any private or public corporation.

(b) Transfer or countersign any evidences of indebtedness which it may insure. 

(c) Transfer or countersign certificates of stock of any private or public corporation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12394.

A title insurer, as to its title insurance department, shall be subject to and shall comply with all the requirements of the insurance laws and the rules and regulations of the commissioner. It may invest its assets apportioned to its title insurance department, and the accumulations therefrom, in the manner in which the assets of title insurers are allowed by the laws of this state to be invested.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 187, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Business Plans [12396. - 12399.]

12396.

(a) For purposes of this article, “controlled business source” means an affiliate, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1215, of any title insurer, controlled escrow company, or underwritten title company.

(b) For purposes of this article:

(1) “License” means a securities permit issued to a title insurance entity, a license to operate as an underwritten title company, or a certificate of authority to act as a title insurer.

(2) “Licensee”
 means the holder of a license.

(c) For purposes of this article, a title order shall be deemed to emanate from a controlled business source if the controlled business source is acting in the capacity of a principal, lender, representative, or agent of any of the parties to the transaction, or any other person or entity with which the reporting entity has an agreement, written or otherwise, whereby title orders are traded or otherwise exchanged in order to achieve compliance with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12397.

Any applicant for a license shall indicate the applicant’s intent to actively compete in the marketplace for title insurance in each county in which the applicant seeks to or does conduct the business of title insurance. The failure to so indicate shall constitute grounds for denial of the license. Each applicant for a license shall also demonstrate that its plan of operation and intended course of business conduct will not involve reliance for more than 50 percent of its closed title orders from controlled business sources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12397.5.

(a) Each licensee shall make submissions as are required by the Department of Insurance to enable the department to determine the nature and extent of the licensee’s efforts to actively compete in each county in which it transacts its business. The licensee shall maintain records of its title orders sufficient to indicate the source of the title orders.

(b) Competitive behavior shall be measured by the source of closed title orders in each county in which the licensee engages in the title business and by the entity’s progress toward meeting the 50 percent objective
 specified in Section 12397, as indicated in the annual, verified report filed pursuant to subdivision (c).

(c) Within 90 days following the end of each business year, as established by the licensee, each licensee shall file with the commissioner, and any title insurer with which the licensee maintains an underwriting agreement, a verified report executed by the licensee’s chief executive officer or his or her designee under penalty of perjury, stating the percent of closed title orders for each county originating from controlled and noncontrolled business sources. Each title insurer that maintains an underwriting agreement with another licensee shall, within 30 days after receipt of this report, file with the commissioner a verified statement, signed by the licensee’s chief executive officer or by his or her designee under penalty of perjury, that the report is substantially correct or that insufficient information is contained in the report to
 enable an opinion to be formed concerning the correctness of the report.

(d) Upon receipt by the department of a verified statement, signed under penalty of perjury, that less than 5 percent of the business a licensee transacts emanates from controlled business sources, the licensee shall be relieved of further reporting under this article, but shall be subject to reporting under subdivision (c) at any time that 5 percent or more of the business which the licensee transacts emanates from controlled business sources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12398.

The failure of an applicant or licensee to comply with any of the requirements of this article shall be grounds for the denial of an application for a license, the suspension or revocation of an issued license, or other disciplinary action determined by the commissioner, in accordance with procedures prescribed by law therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12399.

Nothing in this article shall limit or preclude the consideration or approval of an application for a license, except as expressly provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Exemptions [12400. - 12400.5.]

12400.

The provisions of subdivision (f) of Section 381, and the provisions of Sections 382, 383, 383.5, 386, 481, 750, 751, 752, 755, 755.5, 756, 757, 758, 759, 760, 760.5, 763, 763.5, 766, 800, 801, 802, 803, and 804, shall not apply to title insurers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------

12400.1.

Article 5.6 (commencing with Section 1875.20) of Chapter 12 of Part 2 of Division 1 does not apply to title insurers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 131, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

12400.5.

A title insurance company or underwritten title company engaged in the business of title insurance, as defined in Section 12340.3, shall not be deemed to have participated in any acts prohibited by Division 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of Title 4 of the Corporations Code solely by reason of engaging in the business of title insurance as authorized pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 314, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Rate Filing and Regulation [12401. - 12401.10.]

12401.

The purpose of this article is to promote the public welfare by regulating rates for the business of title insurance as herein provided to the end that they shall not be excessive, inadequate or unfairly discriminatory. It is the express intent of this article to permit and encourage competition between persons or entities engaged in the business of title insurance on a sound financial basis, and nothing in this article is intended to give the commissioner power to fix and determine a rate level by classification or otherwise.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12401.1.

Every title insurer, underwritten title company, and controlled escrow company shall file with the commissioner its schedules of rates, all regularly issued forms of title policies to which such rates apply, and every modification thereof which it proposes to use in this state. Every schedule of rates filed by a title insurer shall set forth the entire charge to the public for each type of title policy included within such schedule and shall include without separate statement thereof that portion of the charge, if any, which is based upon work performed by an underwritten title company; there shall be no separate filing by an underwritten title company for such work. Every
 filing shall set forth its effective date, which shall be not earlier than the 30th day following its receipt by the commissioner, and shall indicate the character and extent of the coverages and services contemplated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12401.2.

Every title insurer, underwritten title company and controlled escrow company shall establish basic classifications of coverages and services to be used as the basis for determining rates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12401.3.

The following standards shall apply to the making and use of rates pertaining to all the business of title insurance to which the provisions of this article are applicable:

(a) Rates shall not be excessive or inadequate, as herein defined, nor shall they be unfairly discriminatory.

No rate shall be held excessive unless (1) the rate is unreasonably high for the insurance or other services provided, and (2) a reasonable degree of competition does not exist in the particular phase of the business of title insurance to which the rate is
 applicable.

No rate shall be held to be inadequate unless (1) the rate is unreasonably low for the insurance or other services provided and (2) the continued use of the rate endangers the solvency of the person or entity using it, or unless (3) the rate is unreasonably low for the insurance or other services provided and the use of the rate by the person or entity using it has, or if continued will have, the effect of destroying competition or creating a monopoly. However, no rate or rate classification shall be held to be inadequate for the reason that a rate within a rating classification is less than the cost of the risk and expense elements assigned to smaller insurances within that classification, and the excess of the costs may be charged against larger insurances within the classification without rendering the rate or rate classification unfairly discriminatory.

(b) Consideration shall be given,
 to the extent applicable, to past and prospective loss experience within and outside this state, to a reasonable margin for profit and contingencies, to past and prospective expenses both countrywide and those specially applicable to this state, and to all other factors, including judgment factors, deemed relevant within and outside this state.

(c) The systems of expense provisions included in the rates for use by any title insurer, underwritten title company, or controlled escrow company may differ from those of other title insurers, underwritten title companies, or controlled escrow companies to reflect the operating methods of the person or entity with respect to any kind of insurance, or other service, or with respect to any combination thereof.

(d) For the establishment of rates, risks, and services in the business of title insurance may be grouped by classifications into the